Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-1506.
Family assessments by local departments.

A family assessment requires the collection of information necessary to determine:

The immediate safety needs of the child;

The protective and rehabilitative services needs of the child and family that will deter abuse or neglect;

Risk of future harm to the child;

Whether the mother of a child who was exposed in utero to a controlled substance sought substance abuse counseling or treatment prior to the child’s birth; and

Alternative plans for the child’s safety if protective and rehabilitative services are indicated and the family is unable or unwilling to participate in services.

When a local department has been designated as a child-protective services differential response system participant by the Department pursuant to §

63.2-1504

and responds to the report or complaint by conducting a family assessment, the local department shall:

Conduct an immediate family assessment and, if the report or complaint was based upon one of the factors specified in subsection B of §

63.2-1509

, the local department may file a petition pursuant to § 16.1-241.3;

Obtain and consider the results of a search of the child abuse and neglect registry for any individual who is the subject of a family assessment. The local board shall determine whether the individual has resided in another state within at least the preceding five years, and, if he has resided in another state, the local board shall request a search of the child abuse and neglect registry or equivalent registry maintained by such state. The local board also may obtain and consider, in accordance with regulations of the Board, statewide criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange for any individual who is the subject of a family assessment;

Immediately contact the subject of the report and the family of the child alleged to have been abused or neglected and give each a written and an oral explanation of the family assessment procedure. The family assessment shall be in writing and shall be completed in accordance with Board regulation;

Complete the family assessment within 60 days and transmit a report to such effect to the Department and to the person who is the subject of the family assessment;

Consult with the family to arrange for necessary protective and rehabilitative services to be provided to the child and his family. Families have the option of declining the services offered as a result of the family assessment. If the family declines the services, the case shall be closed unless the local department determines that sufficient cause exists to redetermine the case as one that needs to be investigated. In no instance shall a case be redetermined as an investigation solely because the family declines services;

Petition the court for services deemed necessary;

Make no disposition of founded or unfounded for reports in which a family assessment is completed. Reports in which a family assessment is completed shall not be entered into the central registry contained in §

63.2-1515

;

Commence an immediate investigation, if at any time during the completion of the family assessment, the local department determines that an investigation is required; and

Upon request, disclose to the child’s parent or guardian the location of the child, provided that (i) the family assessment has not been completed and a report has not been transmitted pursuant to subdivision 4; (ii) the parent or guardian requesting disclosure of the child’s location has not been the subject of a founded report of child abuse or neglect; (iii) the parent or guardian requesting disclosure of the child’s location has legal custody of the child and provides to the local department any records or other information necessary to verify such custody; (iv) the local department is not aware of any court order, and has confirmed with the child’s other parent or guardian or other person responsible for the care of the child that no court order has been issued, that prohibits or limits contact by the parent or guardian requesting disclosure of the child’s location with the child, the child’s other parent or guardian or other person responsible for the care of the child, or any member of the household in which the child is located; and (v) disclosure of the child’s location to the parent or guardian will not compromise the safety of the child, the child’s other parent or guardian, or any other person responsible for the care of the child.

When a local department has been designated as a child-protective services differential response agency by the Department, the local department may investigate any report of child abuse or neglect, but the following valid reports of child abuse or neglect shall be investigated: (i) sexual abuse, (ii) child fatality, (iii) abuse or neglect resulting in serious injury as defined in §

18.2-371.1

, (iv) cases involving a child’s being left alone in the same dwelling with a person to whom the child is not related by blood or marriage and who has been convicted of an offense against a minor for which registration is required as a Tier III offender pursuant to §

9.1-902

, (v) child has been taken into the custody of the local department, or (vi) cases involving a caretaker at a state-licensed child day center, religiously exempt child day center, licensed, registered or approved family day home, private or public school, hospital or any institution. If a report or complaint is based upon one of the factors specified in subsection B of §

63.2-1509

, the local department shall (a) conduct a family assessment, unless an investigation is required pursuant to this subsection or other provision of law or is necessary to protect the safety of the child, and (b) develop a plan of safe care in accordance with federal law, regardless of whether the local department makes a finding of abuse or neglect.

Any individual who is the subject of a family assessment conducted under this section shall notify the local department prior to changing his place of residence and provide the local department with the address of his new residence.

History.

2000, c. 500, § 63.1-248.6:02; 2002, cc. 641, 642, 747; 2017, cc. 176, 428; 2018, c. 823; 2019, cc. 276, 436; 2020, cc. 5, 228, 829; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 305.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, cc. 641 and 642 amended § 63.1-248.6:02, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, cc. 641 and 642 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Acts 2017, cc. 176 and 428, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 436, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Department of Social Services (the Department) shall document and report to the General Assembly and the Governor by November 1, 2020, the number of individuals who notified a local department of social services of an address change and provided updated contact information pursuant to §

63.2-1505

or

63.2-1506

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, between July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020. Local departments of social services shall provide all information necessary to generate such report to the Department.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 641, in subsection B, inserted “and an oral” in the first sentence in subdivision 2, added the last three sentences in subdivision 4, and inserted the last sentence in subdivision 6.

The 2002 amendment by c. 642 deleted “including, but not limited to, removal of the child or his siblings from their home” from the end of subdivision B 5.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 176 and 428 are identical, inserted subdivision A 4 and made related changes; added the last sentence in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 823 inserted clause (iv) in subsection C and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 276 added subdivision B 2 and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment by c. 436 added subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 5 and 228 are identical, and in subdivision B 4, substituted “60 days” for “45 days” and deleted “However, upon written justification by the local department, the family assessment may be extended, not to exceed a total of 60 days” at the end.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “Tier III” for “violent sexual” in clause (iv) of subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 305, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision B 9 and made related changes.

§ 63.2-1506.1.
Human trafficking assessments by local departments.

If a report or complaint is based upon information and allegations that a child is a victim of sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking as defined in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (22 U.S.C. § 7102 et seq.) and in the federal Justice for Victims of Trafficking Act of 2015 (P.L. 114-22), the local department shall conduct a human trafficking assessment, unless at any time during the human trafficking assessment the local department determines that an investigation or family assessment is required pursuant to §

63.2-1505

or

63.2-1506

.

A human trafficking assessment requires the collection of information necessary to determine:

The immediate safety needs of the child;

The protective and rehabilitative services needs of the child and the child’s family that will deter abuse and neglect; and

Risk of future harm to the child.

When a local department responds to the report or complaint by conducting a human trafficking assessment, the local department may:

Consult with the family to arrange for necessary protective and rehabilitative services to be provided to the child and the child’s family;

Petition the court for services deemed necessary; or

Commence an immediate investigation or family assessment, if at any time during the human trafficking assessment the local department determines that an investigation or family assessment is required pursuant to §

63.2-1505

or

63.2-1506

.

In the event that the parents or guardians of the child reside in a jurisdiction other than that in which the report or complaint was received, the local department that received the report or complaint and the local department where the child resides with his parents or guardians shall work jointly to complete the human trafficking assessment.

Reports or complaints for which a human trafficking assessment is completed shall not be entered into the central registry contained in §

63.2-1515

.

The local department or departments shall notify the Child Protective Services Unit within the Department in writing whenever such a human trafficking assessment is conducted.

When conducting a human trafficking assessment pursuant to this section, the local department may interview the alleged child victim or his siblings without the consent and outside the presence of such child’s or siblings’ parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis, or school personnel.

History.

2019, cc. 381, 687; 2020, cc. 6, 234.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 6 and 234 are identical, and substituted “human trafficking” for “sex trafficking” throughout; and added subsection G.

§ 63.2-1507.
Cooperation by state entities.

All law-enforcement departments and other state and local departments, agencies, authorities and institutions shall cooperate with each child-protective services coordinator of a local department and any multi-discipline teams in the detection and prevention of child abuse.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.17; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).